dev/conjunction/conjunction.ne.dix
<dictionary>
  <pardefs>
  <!-- भएतापनि; भएतापनि; 1 -->
    <pardef n="भएतापनि__cnjsub">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="cnjsub"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- अथबा; अथबा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="अथबा__cnjcoo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- जवकि; जवकि; 1 -->
    <pardef n="जवकि__cnjsub">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="cnjsub"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- अनि; अनि; 1 -->
    <pardef n="अनि__cnjcoo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- यद्यपी; यद्यपी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="यद्यपी__cnjsub">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="cnjsub"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- बरू; बरू; 1 -->
    <pardef n="बरू__cnjcoo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- बरु; बरु; 1 -->
    <pardef n="बरु__cnjcoo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- भएपनि; भएपनि; 1 -->
    <pardef n="भएपनि__cnjsub">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="cnjsub"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- नत्रभने; नत्रभने; 1 -->
    <pardef n="नत्रभने__cnjsub">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="cnjsub"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- जबकि; जबकि; 1 -->
    <pardef n="जबकि__cnjsub">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="cnjsub"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- एव; एव; 1 -->
    <pardef n="एव__cnjcoo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- वा; वा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="वा__cnjcoo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- त्यसकारण; त्यसकारण; 1 -->
    <pardef n="त्यसकारण__cnjsub">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="cnjsub"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- किंवा; किंवा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="किंवा__cnjcoo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- यद्देपी; यद्देपी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="यद्देपी__cnjsub">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="cnjsub"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- बा; बा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="बा__cnjcoo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- अर्थात्; अर्थात्; 1 -->
    <pardef n="अर्थात्__cnjcoo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- यदी; यदी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="यदी__cnjsub">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="cnjsub"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- भन्ने; भन्ने; 1 -->
    <pardef n="भन्ने__cnjsub">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="cnjsub"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- अपितु; अपितु; 1 -->
    <pardef n="अपितु__cnjsub">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="cnjsub"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- अपितु; अपितु; 1 -->
    <pardef n="अपितु__cnjcoo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- अथवा; अथवा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="अथवा__cnjcoo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- भनें; भनें; 1 -->
    <pardef n="भनें__cnjsub">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="cnjsub"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- किनकि; किनकि; 1 -->
    <pardef n="किनकि__cnjsub">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="cnjsub"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- नत्र; नत्र; 1 -->
    <pardef n="नत्र__cnjcoo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- तथापी; तथापी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="तथापी__cnjcoo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- अन्यथा; अन्यथा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="अन्यथा__cnjsub">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="cnjsub"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- अन्यथा; अन्यथा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="अन्यथा__cnjcoo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- भनि; भनि; 1 -->
    <pardef n="भनि__cnjsub">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="cnjsub"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- अन्त; अन्त; 1 -->
    <pardef n="अन्त__cnjcoo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- जवकी; जवकी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="जवकी__cnjsub">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="cnjsub"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- भनेपछि; भनेपछि; 1 -->
    <pardef n="भनेपछि__cnjsub">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="cnjsub"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- तर; तर; 1 -->
    <pardef n="तर__cnjcoo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- तथा; तथा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="तथा__cnjcoo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- नता; नता; 1 -->
    <pardef n="नता__cnjsub">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="cnjsub"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- भनेर; भनेर; 1 -->
    <pardef n="भनेर__cnjsub">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="cnjsub"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- किन्तु; किन्तु; 1 -->
    <pardef n="किन्तु__cnjcoo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- एंव; एंव; 1 -->
    <pardef n="एंव__cnjcoo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- हुनता; हुनता; 1 -->
    <pardef n="हुनता__cnjsub">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="cnjsub"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- किनकी; किनकी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="किनकी__cnjsub">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="cnjsub"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- जबकी; जबकी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="जबकी__cnjsub">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="cnjsub"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- अनी; अनी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="अनी__cnjcoo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- किन; किन; 1 -->
    <pardef n="किन__cnjsub">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="cnjsub"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- नपाए; नपाए; 1 -->
    <pardef n="नपाए__cnjsub">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="cnjsub"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="भएतापनि"><i>भएतापनि</i><par n="भएतापनि__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="अथबा"><i>अथबा</i><par n="अथबा__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="जवकि"><i>जवकि</i><par n="जवकि__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="अनि"><i>अनि</i><par n="अनि__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="यद्यपी"><i>यद्यपी</i><par n="यद्यपी__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="बरू"><i>बरू</i><par n="बरू__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="बरु"><i>बरु</i><par n="बरु__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="भएपनि"><i>भएपनि</i><par n="भएपनि__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="नत्रभने"><i>नत्रभने</i><par n="नत्रभने__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="जबकि"><i>जबकि</i><par n="जबकि__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="एव"><i>एव</i><par n="एव__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="वा"><i>वा</i><par n="वा__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="त्यसकारण"><i>त्यसकारण</i><par n="त्यसकारण__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="किंवा"><i>किंवा</i><par n="किंवा__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="यद्देपी"><i>यद्देपी</i><par n="यद्देपी__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="बा"><i>बा</i><par n="बा__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="अर्थात्"><i>अर्थात्</i><par n="अर्थात्__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="यदी"><i>यदी</i><par n="यदी__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="भन्ने"><i>भन्ने</i><par n="भन्ने__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="अपितु"><i>अपितु</i><par n="अपितु__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="अपितु"><i>अपितु</i><par n="अपितु__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="अथवा"><i>अथवा</i><par n="अथवा__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="भनें"><i>भनें</i><par n="भनें__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="किनकि"><i>किनकि</i><par n="किनकि__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="नत्र"><i>नत्र</i><par n="नत्र__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="तथापी"><i>तथापी</i><par n="तथापी__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="अन्यथा"><i>अन्यथा</i><par n="अन्यथा__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="अन्यथा"><i>अन्यथा</i><par n="अन्यथा__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="भनि"><i>भनि</i><par n="भनि__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="अन्त"><i>अन्त</i><par n="अन्त__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="जवकी"><i>जवकी</i><par n="जवकी__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="भनेपछि"><i>भनेपछि</i><par n="भनेपछि__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="तर"><i>तर</i><par n="तर__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="तथा"><i>तथा</i><par n="तथा__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="नता"><i>नता</i><par n="नता__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="भनेर"><i>भनेर</i><par n="भनेर__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="किन्तु"><i>किन्तु</i><par n="किन्तु__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="एंव"><i>एंव</i><par n="एंव__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="हुनता"><i>हुनता</i><par n="हुनता__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="किनकी"><i>किनकी</i><par n="किनकी__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="जबकी"><i>जबकी</i><par n="जबकी__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="अनी"><i>अनी</i><par n="अनी__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="किन"><i>किन</i><par n="किन__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="नपाए"><i>नपाए</i><par n="नपाए__cnjsub"/></e>
